Hawaii statutes.
§201-62 Facilitated application process.
(a) State agencies are required, and county agencies are authorized and
encouraged, to participate in the facilitated application process set forth
herein.

(b) The department shall serve as the lead
agency for the facilitated application procedure and shall be the lead agency
to administer the facilitated application procedure for any project that
requires both county permit applications and state agency approval.

(c) The procedure shall be as follows:

(1) An applicant for two or more state permits may
apply in writing to the department requesting a facilitated application process
for the consideration of the application. The written request shall include
sufficient data about the proposed project for the department to determine
which other agencies or authorities may have jurisdiction;

(2) Upon receiving a written request for the
facilitated application process, the department shall notify all federal,
state, and county agencies or authorities that the department determines may
have jurisdiction over part or all of the proposed project, and require those
state agencies or authorities and invite those county and federal agencies or
authorities to participate in the facilitated application process;

(3) The applicant and each agency or authority
required or agreeing to participate in the facilitated application process
shall designate a representative to serve on the facilitated application review
team;

(4) Any state agency or authority designated by the
department as a party to an application review that is not able to participate,
shall submit an explanation, in writing, to the department as to the reasons
and circumstances for noncompliance;

(5) The representatives of the agencies, authorities,
and the applicant may develop and sign a joint agreement among themselves
identifying the members of the facilitated application review team, specifying
the regulatory and review responsibilities of each government agency and
setting forth the responsibilities of the applicant, and establishing a
timetable for regulatory review, the conduct of necessary hearings, preparation
of an environmental impact statement if necessary, and other actions required
to minimize duplication and coordinate the activities of the applicant,
agencies, and authorities;

(6) Each agency or authority shall issue its own
permit or approval based upon its own jurisdiction. The facilitated
application process shall not affect or invalidate the jurisdiction or
authority of any agency under existing law; and

(7) The applicant shall apply directly to each
federal or county agency that does not participate in the facilitated
application process.

(d) If a state regulatory permit is necessary
to obtain a county permit, then a county agreeing to participate in the
facilitated application process may advise the applicant of the facilitated
application procedure. To apply for the facilitated application procedure,
applicants for county permits involving state permit approvals shall submit a
form, which shall be issued by the department; provided that this procedure
shall apply only to state permits that need to be approved by a state agency
following a review of the plans and certifications submitted by the applicant.
State permits that are approved by rule require only that the licensed design
professional certify that the plans and specifications are in compliance with
state rules. No review by a state agency is required for state approval.
Plans and specifications requiring state agency review shall be submitted with
the facilitated application procedure to the appropriate state agency, with a
copy to the department. If a state permit is approved by rule, then the
participating county shall provide a set of drawings and specifications
submitted by the applicant to the state agency that developed the rules.

In developing the procedures for approval by
rule and by review, permit requirements shall be clearly stated. Performance
standards, rather than specific technologies or procedures, shall be specified
when appropriate.

(e) For purposes of this section:

"Permit by review" means permits
approved by the appropriate state departments.

"Permit by rule" means permits
approved by administrative rule. [L 1985, c 237, pt of §4; am L 1987, c 87, pt
of §1; am L 1997, c 127, §3; am L 1999, c 243, §2]

Cross References

Business action
center, see chapter 201D.

Concurrent
processing, see §46‑15.7.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next